District of Columbia statutes.
7-1611

Findings.

The Council finds that:

(1)

Effi Slaughter Barry, a former First Lady of the District of Columbia, was among the first public figures in the District to focus attention on the growing health problem of HIV/AIDS;

(2)

Effi Slaughter Barry, a trained and experienced health professional, was a champion of HIV/AIDS prevention and wellness and was particularly concerned with the dearth of services East of the River;

(3)

At the time of her death, September 6, 2007, Effi Slaughter Barry, was Director of Special Projects in the Office of the Director of the Department of Health, providing direct leadership to the East of the River HIV/AIDS Initiative; and

(4)

In light of Effi Slaughter Barry’s commitment to health and, in particular, to helping residents of the District of Columbia combat HIV/AIDS, it is fitting that the East of the River HIV/AIDS Capacity Building Initiative should be known as the Effi Slaughter Barry HIV/AIDS Initiative.

Mar. 20, 2008, D.C. Law 17-117, § 2, 55 DCR 1282